utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY аеоинвтрслпкудмзбчгјшцњжфхќџѓљѕѐѝАЕОИНВТРСЛПКУДМЗБЧГЈШЦЊЖФХЌЏЃЉЅЀЍ-’!.
FLAG num
SFX 1867 Y 1
SFX 1867 0 арската .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 јов .
SFX 3599 Y 1
SFX 3599 0 јон .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 екувањана .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 аденово .
SFX 3683 Y 1
SFX 3683 0 овниве .
SFX 3886 Y 1
SFX 3886 0 нковска .
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 0 нковски .
SFX 4029 Y 1
SFX 4029 0 онче .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 ливоста .
SFX 3062 Y 1
SFX 3062 0 рноста .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 еченово .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 чнана .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 вала .
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 0 енат .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 вале .
SFX 653 Y 1
SFX 653 0 вало .
SFX 2365 Y 1
SFX 2365 0 тските .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 рис .
SFX 2328 Y 1
SFX 2328 0 риш .
SFX 3368 Y 1
SFX 3368 0 риј .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 риќ .
SFX 1520 Y 1
SFX 1520 0 чани .
SFX 4469 Y 1
SFX 4469 0 дирање .
SFX 4471 Y 1
SFX 4471 0 вувате .
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 0 зот .
SFX 3902 Y 1
SFX 3902 0 чувана .
SFX 3901 Y 1
SFX 3901 0 чувани .
SFX 4202 Y 1
SFX 4202 0 еаново .
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 0 чувано .
SFX 1499 Y 1
SFX 1499 0 нер .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 нет .
SFX 774 Y 1
SFX 774 0 нец .
SFX 1023 Y 1
SFX 1023 0 неш .
SFX 3826 Y 1
SFX 3826 0 неј .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 сувавме .
SFX 3980 Y 1
SFX 3980 0 жниов .
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 0 жнион .
SFX 2431 Y 1
SFX 2431 0 ега .
SFX 663 Y 1
SFX 663 0 ината .
SFX 3081 Y 1
SFX 3081 0 искана .
SFX 3698 Y 1
SFX 3698 0 ечевме .
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 0 каново .
SFX 4984 Y 1
SFX 4984 0 иваа .
SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 0 ивал .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 ивам .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 веше .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 јуваат .
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 0 нскана .
SFX 4587 Y 1
SFX 4587 0 орил .
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 0 киве .
SFX 1079 Y 1
SFX 1079 0 натана .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 0 ожат .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 0 есен .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 0 тизира .
SFX 3833 Y 1
SFX 3833 0 гер .
SFX 621 Y 1
SFX 621 0 рањето .
SFX 2985 Y 1
SFX 2985 0 сена .
SFX 2610 Y 1
SFX 2610 0 сени .
SFX 2609 Y 1
SFX 2609 0 сено .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 аков .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 аџија .
SFX 4858 Y 1
SFX 4858 0 бениов .
SFX 4857 Y 1
SFX 4857 0 бенион .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 лата .
SFX 4767 Y 1
SFX 4767 0 ичариве .
SFX 4708 Y 1
SFX 4708 0 ствената .
SFX 4172 Y 1
SFX 4172 0 творен .
SFX 3788 Y 1
SFX 3788 0 иена .
SFX 3580 Y 1
SFX 3580 0 иени .
SFX 2034 Y 1
SFX 2034 0 иено .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 0 жениов .
SFX 2939 Y 1
SFX 2939 0 женион .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 ца .
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 0 це .
SFX 85 Y 1
SFX 85 0 ци .
SFX 1864 Y 1
SFX 1864 0 цо .
SFX 268 Y 1
SFX 268 0 увањево .
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 0 стат .
SFX 3532 Y 1
SFX 3532 0 делен .
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 0 ака .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 аки .
SFX 3069 Y 1
SFX 3069 0 лениов .
SFX 3068 Y 1
SFX 3068 0 ленион .
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 0 чните .
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 0 овница .
SFX 3461 Y 1
SFX 3461 0 овници .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 ажел .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 0 ажен .
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 0 чите .
SFX 4019 Y 1
SFX 4019 0 рика .
SFX 3584 Y 1
SFX 3584 0 длив .
SFX 1506 Y 1
SFX 1506 0 ностите .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 ирањено .
SFX 3141 Y 1
SFX 3141 0 днана .
SFX 3392 Y 1
SFX 3392 0 шувањата .
SFX 3077 Y 1
SFX 3077 0 кањана .
SFX 4049 Y 1
SFX 4049 0 еете .
SFX 1824 Y 1
SFX 1824 0 иските .
SFX 374 Y 1
SFX 374 0 тото .
SFX 3750 Y 1
SFX 3750 0 адела .
SFX 3749 Y 1
SFX 3749 0 аделе .
SFX 3748 Y 1
SFX 3748 0 адело .
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 0 ече .
SFX 1813 Y 1
SFX 1813 0 ечи .
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 0 лноста .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 лив .
SFX 1560 Y 1
SFX 1560 0 лии .
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 0 лик .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 0 лин .
SFX 4054 Y 1
SFX 4054 0 гува .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 тање .
SFX 2537 Y 1
SFX 2537 0 чувавте .
SFX 786 Y 1
SFX 786 0 нските .
SFX 4551 Y 1
SFX 4551 0 вивме .
SFX 357 Y 1
SFX 357 0 да .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 овина .
SFX 548 Y 1
SFX 548 0 де .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 овине .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 ди .
SFX 1025 Y 1
SFX 1025 0 до .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 тичар .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 ичиња .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 кувајте .
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 0 лошкиот .
SFX 2293 Y 1
SFX 2293 0 сното .
SFX 3723 Y 1
SFX 3723 0 севте .
SFX 4463 Y 1
SFX 4463 0 есниот .
SFX 3423 Y 1
SFX 3423 0 аденине .
SFX 2712 Y 1
SFX 2712 0 пнува .
SFX 1386 Y 1
SFX 1386 0 ичната .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 ечка .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 ечки .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 ечко .
SFX 4219 Y 1
SFX 4219 0 чевиќ .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 иштето .
SFX 1149 Y 1
SFX 1149 0 рскиот .
SFX 3228 Y 1
SFX 3228 0 еченине .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 вана .
SFX 890 Y 1
SFX 890 0 вани .
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 0 вано .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 анскиве .
SFX 665 Y 1
SFX 665 0 неше .
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 0 изатор .
SFX 1072 Y 1
SFX 1072 0 арот .
SFX 3722 Y 1
SFX 3722 0 става .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 анката .
SFX 4205 Y 1
SFX 4205 0 еанине .
SFX 2403 Y 1
SFX 2403 0 олува .
SFX 2462 Y 1
SFX 2462 0 товите .
SFX 3195 Y 1
SFX 3195 0 сувањето .
SFX 4393 Y 1
SFX 4393 0 тичкото .
SFX 4449 Y 1
SFX 4449 0 низира .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 еев .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 еел .
SFX 1134 Y 1
SFX 1134 0 еен .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 лививе .
SFX 4135 Y 1
SFX 4135 0 инскине .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 едува .
SFX 3471 Y 1
SFX 3471 0 канине .
SFX 2352 Y 1
SFX 2352 0 нуваниот .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 хан .
SFX 848 Y 1
SFX 848 0 нувајте .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 алува .
SFX 4150 Y 1
SFX 4150 0 арскава .
SFX 4959 Y 1
SFX 4959 0 ојте .
SFX 2027 Y 1
SFX 2027 0 орка .
SFX 2015 Y 1
SFX 2015 0 дните .
SFX 3120 Y 1
SFX 3120 0 ривме .
SFX 3849 Y 1
SFX 3849 0 истичкото .
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 0 ечеше .
SFX 3703 Y 1
SFX 3703 0 анците .
SFX 4439 Y 1
SFX 4439 0 пираат .
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 0 ањана .
SFX 4228 Y 1
SFX 4228 0 ослав .
SFX 2953 Y 1
SFX 2953 0 тката .
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 0 јат .
SFX 3442 Y 1
SFX 3442 0 тскиве .
SFX 1830 Y 1
SFX 1830 0 ничар .
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 0 инаа .
SFX 4037 Y 1
SFX 4037 0 инав .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 инал .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 лизираат .
SFX 4183 Y 1
SFX 4183 0 нирана .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 нирани .
SFX 4447 Y 1
SFX 4447 0 нирано .
SFX 2608 Y 1
SFX 2608 0 тери .
SFX 2595 Y 1
SFX 2595 0 инава .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 шна .
SFX 1495 Y 1
SFX 1495 0 шни .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 ша .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 шно .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 ше .
SFX 528 Y 1
SFX 528 0 ши .
SFX 1172 Y 1
SFX 1172 0 ецов .
SFX 1241 Y 1
SFX 1241 0 ецон .
SFX 4717 Y 1
SFX 4717 0 изирајте .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 иот .
SFX 2970 Y 1
SFX 2970 0 виште .
SFX 1054 Y 1
SFX 1054 0 ваната .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 0 руваме .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 аме .
SFX 2055 Y 1
SFX 2055 0 ами .
SFX 3276 Y 1
SFX 3276 0 удува .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 р .
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 0 с .
SFX 25 Y 1
SFX 25 0 т .
SFX 89 Y 1
SFX 89 0 у .
SFX 699 Y 1
SFX 699 0 ф .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 х .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 ц .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 ч .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 ш .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 0 ј .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 љ .
SFX 3390 Y 1
SFX 3390 0 њ .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ќ .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 иените .
SFX 4518 Y 1
SFX 4518 0 онине .
SFX 2229 Y 1
SFX 2229 0 риме .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 рањево .
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 0 алиште .
SFX 4571 Y 1
SFX 4571 0 тнат .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 адена .
SFX 3540 Y 1
SFX 3540 0 адени .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 адено .
SFX 2731 Y 1
SFX 2731 0 етен .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 лава .
SFX 3784 Y 1
SFX 3784 0 лави .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 изации .
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 0 удат .
SFX 3690 Y 1
SFX 3690 0 лскиот .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 дер .
SFX 4652 Y 1
SFX 4652 0 деш .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 лка .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 лки .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 0 тивниот .
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 0 анине .
SFX 4775 Y 1
SFX 4775 0 екуваме .
SFX 387 Y 1
SFX 387 0 уваниот .
SFX 1426 Y 1
SFX 1426 0 жа .
SFX 1347 Y 1
SFX 1347 0 же .
SFX 294 Y 1
SFX 294 0 ираат .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 жи .
SFX 4057 Y 1
SFX 4057 0 атов .
SFX 4446 Y 1
SFX 4446 0 новите .
SFX 1251 Y 1
SFX 1251 0 нката .
SFX 2535 Y 1
SFX 2535 0 чувајќи .
SFX 3972 Y 1
SFX 3972 0 ичено .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 0 чниве .
SFX 395 Y 1
SFX 395 0 лија .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 рената .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 епува .
