utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
ест/3,1322,1655,3779,3965,4398,4399,4577,4587,4760
дрдо/141,317,429,515,519,533,1123,1244,1309,1436,1605,1846,1905,1966,2078,2079,2229,2328
хаус/1499
кафе/2,5,8,11,16,27,30,34,35,36,47,51,52,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,123,162,166,223,335,372,381,394,425,426,450,465,501,607,878,934,949,1102,1217,1352,1471,1526,1610,1679,1862,2301,2412,2605,2647,2665,2838,2850,3028,3751,3752,3868,4263,4864,4938
симе/20,2488,3599,3779
долг/23,26,28,36,38,42,43,44,45,154,164,232,314,315,351,363,364,385,387,780,1084,1351,1574,1739,1740,1797,2003,2192,2465,3678,3679,3680,3681,3682,3683,3684,3685,4329
бади/2637
мари/34,42,116,154,164,355,569,630,685,918,1022,1031,1163,1196,1284,1310,1379,1420,1445,1499,1514,1799,1831,1891,1989,2283,2357,2374,2988,3043,3124,3687,3726,3779,4073,4123,4182,4637,4639
преч/343,384,396,417,431,439,440,445,446,507,637,1809,2156,2235,2997,3691,3955,4463
стин/3833
заст/454,1085,1442,1654,1750,2167,2431,2748,2749,2850,3276,4059,4118,4346,4998
паро/523,989,1035,1399,1547,2999,3700,4469
раст/576,628,949,990,1123,1373,1496,1533,1557,1605,1990,2171,2740,2830,2869,2950,2958,2986,3004,3042,3118,3145,3314,3317,3368,3370,3377,3654,3660,3661,3774,3812,3914,3962,3963,3997,4020,4061,4152,4176,4346,4422,4574,4827,4895,4900,4936,4960,5000
бале/606,1170,1243,1316,1425,1792,2143,2187,2274,2307,2365,2683,3834,4018,4435,4811
карт/706,747,844,1073,1238,1252,1278,1322,1349,1446,1553,1615,1784,1998,2028,2474,2488,2533,2732,2835,2884,4029,4198,4244,4260,4518,4519,4760
кали/73,465,750,1031,1196,1251,1284,1310,1333,1339,1379,1583,1619,1789,1842,2254,2271,2458,2627,3043,3185,3521,3558,3886,4233
немо/738,1280,1495,1928,3529,3977,3978,3979,3980,3981,3982,3983,3984,4497
доба/845,1531,1613,1854,1860,1996,2053,2075,2098,2161,2322,2424,2501,2502,2523,2568,2638,2736,2737,2744,2808,2946,3001,3087,3088,3089,3090,3091,3092,3093,3094,3354,3534,3535,3588,3806,3838,4550,4551
пола/894,1142,1330,1333,1360,1490,1587,1714,1715,1716,1717,1718,1719,1720,1721,1897,1904,1993,2015,2175,2471,2600,3018,3062,3134,3135,3137,3138,3139,3140,3141,3142,3170,3591,3790,3791,3792,3846,3975,3976,4041,4087,4578
готов/110,189,223,663,688,703,934,1643,2084,2268,2774,2894
живин/1101,1159,1168,1867,2062,2089,2126
клари/20,392,871,1493
манда/31,33,92,113,221,318,319,320,373,480,502,506,515,606,672,676,757,947,988,999,1000,1060,1105,1165,1170,1176,1182,1233,1296,1406,1425,1435,1458,1711,1857,2128,2145,2170,2981,3910,4018
натал/396,694,3080,3334,3825,4963
доста/5,203,240,361,365,366,373,386,456,461,671,757,771,804,944,985,1038,1117,1233,1649,2327,2633,2896,2981,3056,3116,3195,3204,3205,3206,3238,3239,3240,3241,3242,3278,3279,3280,3281,3282,3320,3913,4275,4437,4438,4505,4573,4695,4696,4697,4698,4699,4700,4701,4702,4703,4704,4705,4706,4807
сушти/52,57,58,60,62,369,661,734,751,786,911,1150,1151,1152,1153,1154,1155,1156,1157
извод/529,828,859,946,2134,2494
надви/7,10,50,54,61,70,80,102,143,152,163,165,171,174,175,331,342,396,414,430,457,511,528,575,609,642,643,653,659,678,694,939,1020,1177,1293,1372,1428,1459,1470,1513,1594,1638,1648,1672,1692,1712,1733,1734,1843,1844,1845,2181,3024
проја/79,308,358,443,508,548,613,655,689,749,847,939,1028,1092,1197,1256,1297,1431,1613,1638,1688,1825,2053,2322,2568,3001,3806,4471
потем/8,15,51,55,57,58,60,62,63,64,65,66,191,233,241,251,258,259,322,641,871,1652,1858,2106,2246,3826,4595,4907,4908,4909,4965,4966
спота/93,269,565,1490,1936,2000
воздив/5,15,35,50,191,233,241,258,259,289,295,297,650,665,666,684,685,742,743,827,915,968,987,1023,1100,1138,4371
србија/667,774,1022
џулија/8,3846,4349
студени/1520,2560
раствор/2,3,5,13,21,80,93,94,101,102,106,111,143,152,158,161,163,165,169,171,173,174,175,178,181,184,188,196,197,200,201,202,204,207,208,210,211,212,214,215,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,269,293,300,311,338,389,410,444,529,608,692,752,828,859,946,1317,1457,4375
стратег/350,391,811,1122,1128,1206,1340,1510,1586,1657,1677,1824,2153,2154,2199,2811,2812,2813,2814,3081,3082,3257,3258,3259,3260,3261,3262
табанов/557
катаклизми/100,377,1124,1394,1395
